en: Loafers
xx: Loafers
fr: Mocassins

en: Sandals
xx: Sandals
fr: Sandales, Nu-pieds

en: Flip-Flops
xx: Flip-Flops
fr: Tongs, Savattes

en: Slippers
xx: Slippers
fr: Chaussons, Pantoufles

en: Clogs
xx: Clogs
fr: Sabots

en: Snow Boots
xx: Snow Boots
fr: Après-ski, Snow-boot

en: High Heels
xx: High Heels
fr: Escarpins

en: Dress Shoes
xx: Dress Shoes
fr: Souliers

en: Babouches
xx: Babouches
fr: Babouches

en: Software
xx: Software
cs: Software
da: Software
de: Software
es: Software
fr: Logiciels
it: Software
ja: ソフトウェア
nl: Software
no: Programvare
pl: Oprogramowanie
pt: Software
ru: Программное обеспечение
sv: Programvara
tr: Yazılım

en: Computer Software
xx: Computer Software
cs: Počítačový software
da: Computersoftware
de: Computersoftware
es: Software informático
fr: Logiciels informatiques
it: Software per computer
ja: PCソフト
nl: Computersoftware
no: Datamaskinprogramvare
pl: Programy komputerowe
pt: Software de computador
ru: Программное обеспечение для компьютеров
sv: Datorprogramvara
tr: Bilgisayar Yazılımları

en: Antivirus & Security Software
xx: Antivirus & Security Software
cs: Antivirový a bezpečnostní software
da: Antivirus- og sikkerhedssoftware
de: Antiviren- & Sicherheitssoftware
es: Software de seguridad y antivirus
fr: Antivirus et logiciels de sécurité
it: Software antivirus e sicurezza
ja: セキュリティ・ウイルス対策ソフト
nl: Antivirus- en beveiligingssoftware
no: Antivirus- og sikkerhetsprogramvare
pl: Programy antywirusowe i zabezpieczające
pt: Antivírus e software de segurança
ru: Антивирусное программное обеспечение
sv: Antivirus och säkerhetsprogram
tr: Antivirüs ve Güvenlik Yazılımları

en: Business & Productivity Software
xx: Business & Productivity Software
cs: Pracovní a produktivní software
da: Forretnings- og produktivitetssoftware
de: Unternehmens- & Produktivitätssoftware
es: Software corporativo y de productividad
fr: Logiciels d'entreprise et de productivité
it: Software per le aziende e la produttività
ja: ビジネスソフト
nl: Bedrijfs- en productiviteitssoftware
no: Forretnings- og produktivitetsprogramvare
pl: Programy dla firm i do pracy
pt: Software de negócios e de produtividade
ru: Программное обеспечение для работы и бизнеса
sv: Företags- och produktivitetsprogram
tr: İş ve Verimlilik Yazılımları

en: Compilers & Programming Tools
xx: Compilers & Programming Tools
cs: Kompilátory a vývojářské nástroje
da: Compilere og programmeringsværktøjer
de: Compiler & Programmierungstools
es: Herramientas de compilación y programación
fr: Outils de compilation et de programmation
it: Strumenti compilazione/programmazione
ja: コンパイラ・プログラミングツール
nl: Compilers en programmeerhulpmiddelen
no: Kompilatorer og programmeringsverktøy
pl: Kompilatory i narzędzia programistyczne
pt: Compiladores e ferramentas de programação
ru: Компиляторы и средства программирования
sv: Kompilatorer och programmeringsverktyg
tr: Derleme ve Programlama Araçları

en: Computer Utilities & Maintenance Software
xx: Computer Utilities & Maintenance Software
cs: Softwarové nástroje a údržba počítačů
da: Software til computervedligeholdelse
de: Computerdienstprogramme & -wartung
es: Utilidades y software de mantenimiento para ordenadores
fr: Logiciels utilitaires et de maintenance
it: Software di manutenzione e utility PC
ja: PCユーティリティ・メンテナンスソフト
nl: Computerprogramma's en onderhoudssoftware
no: Datamaskinutstyr og vedlikeholdsprogramvare
pl: Programy pomocnicze i konserwacyjne
pt: Software de manutenção e utilitários para computadores
ru: Утилиты и служебное программное обеспечение для компьютеров
sv: Datorverktyg och underhållsprogramvara
tr: Bilgisayar Yardımcı Araçları ve Bakım Yazılımları

en: Dictionary & Translation Software
xx: Dictionary & Translation Software
cs: Slovníkový a překladový software
da: Ordbøger og oversættelsessoftware
de: Wörterbuch- & Übersetzungssoftware
es: Software de diccionario y traducción
fr: Logiciels dictionnaires et traducteurs
it: Software traduzione e dizionari
ja: 辞書・翻訳ソフト
nl: Woordenboeken- en vertaalsoftware
no: Ordbok- og oversettelsesprogramvare
pl: Słowniki i translatory
pt: Dicionário e software de tradução
ru: Программное обеспечение для переводов и словари
sv: Ordlistor och program för översättning
tr: Sözlük ve Çeviri Yazılımları

en: Educational Software
xx: Educational Software
cs: Výukový software
da: Uddannelsessoftware
de: Lernsoftware
es: Software educativo
fr: Logiciels éducatifs
it: Software educativo
ja: 教育・学習ソフト
nl: Educatieve software
no: Opplæringsprogramvare
pl: Programy edukacyjne
pt: Software educativo
ru: Программное обеспечение для обучения
sv: Utbildningsprogramvara
tr: Eğitim Yazılımları

en: Financial\, Tax & Accounting Software
xx: Financial\, Tax & Accounting Software
cs: Finanční\, daňový a účetní software
da: Software til økonomi\, moms og regnskab
de: Steuer- & Buchhaltungssoftware
es: Software de contabilidad
fr: Logiciels de comptabilité
it: Software per tasse
ja: 税務・会計ソフト
nl: Belastingsoftware
no: Finans-\, skatte- og regnskapsprogramvare
pl: Programy finansowe\, podatkowe i księgowe
pt: Software de contabilidade e impostos
ru: Финансовое\, бухгалтерское и налоговое программное обеспечение
sv: Program för finans\, skatt och bokföring
tr: Finans\, Vergi ve Muhasebe Yazılımları

en: GPS Map Data & Software
xx: GPS Map Data & Software
cs: Mapová data a software GPS
da: GPS-kortdata og -software
de: GPS-Karten & -Software
es: Software y datos de mapa para GPS
fr: Logiciels et données cartographiques GPS
it: Dati e software per mappe GPS
ja: GPS地図ソフト
nl: GPS-kaartgegevens en -software
no: GPS-kartdata og -programvare
pl: Mapy i programy do nawigacji GPS
pt: Dados e software para mapas de GPS
ru: Программное обеспечение и данные для GPS
sv: GPS-kartdata och GPS-program
tr: GPS Harita Verileri ve Yazılımları

en: Handheld & PDA Software
xx: Handheld & PDA Software
cs: Software pro handheldy a PDA
da: Software til håndholdte enheder og PDA'er
de: Handheld- & PDA-Software
es: Software para PDA y dispositivos portátiles
fr: Logiciels pour PDA et ordinateurs de poche
it: Software palmari e PDA
ja: PDAソフト
nl: Handheld- en PDA-software
no: Programvare til håndholdte enheter og PDA-er
pl: Programy na palmtopy i urządzenia PDA
pt: Handheld e software de PDA
ru: Программное обеспечение для КПК
sv: Program för handdatorer
tr: Taşınabilir Cihaz ve PDA Yazılımları